Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB90.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 441.9 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 441.9. Verification of Eligibility.--* * *(d) All applicants and recipients shall, as a condition of eligibility, cooperate with the department in securing medical support from the noncustodial parent of any child for whom medical assistance is sought or provided in all cases in which support is being sought for the child . The department may not accept a private agreement between a custodial parent and a noncustodial parent that the custodial parent will provide medical support if the agreement results in the child foregoing medical support which would otherwise be available to the child 12345678910111213141516171819 under 23 Pa.C.S. § 4326 (relating to mandatory inclusion of child medical support). An agreement made in violation of this subsection shall be considered void as contrary to public policy. Medical assistance shall be provided to a child without delay while the department is making a determination of the noncustodial parent's ability to provide medical support.(e) The requirements of subsection (d) may not apply if:(1) The custodial parent is a victim of domestic violence perpetrated by the noncustodial parent. Domestic violence shall be verified using State standards developed under 42 U.S.C. § 602(a)(7) (relating to eligible states and state plan) . (2) The application of subsection (d) endangers the well-being of a child by interrupting the child's continuity of medical care.(3) The pursuit of medical support from the noncustodial parent harms either the child or the custodial parent's well-being as documented in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.(f) If the department determines that the noncustodial parent withheld information required under subsection (d), the noncustodial parent shall reimburse the department for the cost of the medical assistance provided to the child. Nothing in this section shall be construed to make the minor ineligible for medical assistance.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0090PN0073 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425